Georgia, session 2025_26, HB927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to insurance, is amended by
revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 33-29-3.2, relating to coverage of
mammograms, Pap smears, and prostate-specific antigen tests, and notice of coverage, as
follows:
"(1) 'Female at risk' means a woman:
(A) Who has a personal history of breast cancer;
(B) Who has a personal history of biopsy proven benign breast disease;
(C) Whose grandmother, mother, sister, or daughter Who has one or more first or
second degree relatives who has had breast cancer; or
(D) Who has not given birth prior to age 30."
H. B. 927
- 1 -

LC 57 0265
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section
33-30-4.2, relating to insurance coverage for mammograms, Pap smears, and
prostate-specific antigen tests, as follows:
"(1) 'Female at risk' means a woman:
(A) Who has a personal history of breast cancer;
(B) Who has a personal history of biopsy proven benign breast disease;
(C) Whose grandmother, mother, sister, or daughter Who has one or more first or
second degree relatives who has had breast cancer; or
(D) Who has not given birth prior to age 30."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all policies or contracts
issued, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state on or after such date.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 927
- 2 -